Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1372XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1372XD (9) 91
cm/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 602.6302, subsection 1, paragraph b,
Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
b. The substitution must not result in a lack of a resident
at least one district associate judge or magistrate in one
or more of the counties appointed to serve each county. A
district associate judge appointed in lieu of a magistrate may
be appointed to serve more than one county.
Sec. 2. Section 602.6401, subsections 1, 2, and 3, Code
2025, are amended to read as follows:
1. Two hundred six magistrates shall be apportioned
among the counties as provided in this section. Magistrates
appointed pursuant to section 602.6303 or 602.6402 shall not
be counted for purposes of this section The supreme court
shall prescribe a formula for the state court administrator
to determine the number of magistrates who will serve in each
judicial election district, pursuant to subsection 2. The
formula must be based on a model that measures and applies an
estimated case-related workload formula of magistrates, and
must account for administrative duties, travel time, on-call
time, and other judicial duties not related to a specific case.
2. By February of each year in which magistrates’ terms
expire, the state court administrator shall apportion
magistrate offices among the counties in accordance with the
following criteria:
a. The existence of either permanent, temporary, or seasonal
populations not included in the current census figures.
b. The geographical area to be served.
c. Any inordinate number of cases over which magistrates
have jurisdiction that were pending at the end of the preceding
year.
d. The number and types of juvenile proceedings handled by
district associate judges apply the formula prescribed pursuant
to subsection 1 to calculate the number of magistrates and
apportion magistrates among the judicial districts.
3. Notwithstanding subsection 2, each county shall be
LSB 1372XD (9) 91
-1- cm/ns 1/5

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
allotted at least one resident magistrate shall be appointed to
serve each county. A magistrate may be appointed to serve more
than one county.
Sec. 3. Section 602.6403, subsections 1, 2, 3, 5, 7, and 9,
Code 2025, are amended to read as follows:
1. By June 1 of each year in which magistrates’ terms
expire, the county magistrate appointing commission or
commissions shall appoint, except as otherwise provided in
section 602.6302, the number of magistrates apportioned to the
county by the state court administrator under section 602.6401,
shall appoint the number of magistrates required pursuant to
substitution orders in effect under section 602.6303, and
may appoint an additional magistrate when allowed by section
602.6402. The commission shall not appoint more magistrates
than are authorized for the county by this article In the
case of a magistrate to be appointed in more than one county,
the appointment shall be from persons nominated by the county
magistrate appointing commission of each county acting jointly.
2. The magistrate appointing commission for each county
supreme court shall prescribe the contents of an application,
in addition to any application form provided by the supreme
court, for an appointment pursuant to this section. The
commission or commissions shall publicize notice of any vacancy
to be filled in at least two publications in all official
county newspapers in the county or counties of appointment.
The commission or commissions shall accept applications for a
minimum of fifteen days prior to making an appointment, and
shall make available during that period of time any printed
application forms the commission prescribes.
3. Within thirty days following receipt of notification
of a vacancy in the office of magistrate, the commission or
commissions shall appoint a person to the office to serve the
remainder of the unexpired term. For purposes of this section,
vacancy “vacancy” means a death, resignation, retirement,
or removal of a magistrate, or an increase in the number of
LSB 1372XD (9) 91
-2- cm/ns 2/5

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
positions authorized.
5. The commission or commissions shall promptly certify the
names and addresses of appointees to the clerk of the district
court and to the chief judge of the judicial district. The
clerk of the district court shall certify to the state court
administrator the names and addresses of these appointees.
7. Before the commencement of the term of a magistrate, the
members of the magistrate appointing commission or commissions
may reconsider the appointment. Written notification of the
reasons for reconsideration and time and place for the meeting
must be sent to the magistrate appointee and the clerk of the
district court. The commission or commissions may reconvene
and decertify the magistrate appointee for good cause.
Notice of the decertification and a statement of the reasons
justifying the decertification shall be promptly sent to the
clerk of the district court, the chief judge of the judicial
district, and the state court administrator.
9. A magistrate who seeks to resign from the office of
magistrate shall notify in writing the chief judge of the
judicial district as to the magistrate’s intention to resign
and the effective date of the resignation. The chief judge of
the judicial district, upon receipt of the notice, shall notify
the county magistrate appointing commission or commissions and
the state court administrator of the vacancy in the office of
magistrate due to resignation.
Sec. 4. Section 602.6403, Code 2025, is amended by adding
the following new subsections:
NEW SUBSECTION. 10. a. Notwithstanding section 602.6401,
subsection 3, if a vacancy occurs as described in subsection
3 of this section, that cannot be filled, the chief judge of
the judicial district shall assign a magistrate from one county
within the judicial election district to serve the remainder of
the unexpired term in the county in which the vacancy exists,
in addition to the county to which the magistrate is appointed,
if the combined weighted workload of the two counties does
LSB 1372XD (9) 91
-3- cm/ns 3/5

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
not exceed thirty-one percent of a full-time position, on a
continuing basis if need be, in order to handle the judicial
business in all counties promptly and efficiently at all times.
b. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2029.
NEW SUBSECTION. 11. a. Notwithstanding section 602.6401,
subsection 3, the magistrate assigned pursuant to subsection
10 shall be a resident of the judicial election district or
a resident of a county contiguous to the judicial election
district during the magistrate’s term of office, in accordance
with section 602.6404, subsection 1.
b. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2029.
Sec. 5. Section 602.6404, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
1. A magistrate shall be a resident of the county of
appointment judicial election district or a resident of
a county contiguous to the county of appointment judicial
election district during the magistrate’s term of office.
A magistrate shall serve within the judicial district in
which appointed, as directed by the chief judge, provided
that the chief judge may assign a magistrate to hold court
outside of the county or counties of appointment for the
orderly administration of justice. A magistrate is subject to
reassignment under section 602.6108.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following take effect January
1, 2029:
1. The section of this Act amending section 602.6401.
2. The section of this Act amending section 602.6403,
subsections 1, 2, 3, 5, 7, and 9.